Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2026
2-10,117

Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund; created; use;
investment.

All money received from any source pursuant to the Plant Protection and Plant
Pest Act shall be remitted by the department to the State Treasurer and by the
State Treasurer credited to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash Fund which
is hereby created. The fund shall be used by the department to aid in defraying
the expenses of administering the act. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The
State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Nebraska Potato Development Fund
upon the termination of such fund to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Cash
Fund.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 46;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 33;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 869, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 5.

March 17, 2026

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section
72-1260.